Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 15.1 The Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act

15-15.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 284, § 2.

15-15.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Court” means the family court.

“Foreign protection order” means a protection order issued by a tribunal of another state.

“Issuing state” means the state whose tribunal issues a protection order.

“Mutual foreign protection order” means a foreign protection order that includes provisions in favor of both the protected individual seeking enforcement of the order and the respondent.

“Protected individual” means an individual protected by a protection order.

“Protection order” means an injunction or other order, issued by a tribunal under the domestic-violence, family-violence, or anti-stalking laws of the issuing state, to prevent an individual from engaging in violent or threatening acts against, harassment of, contact or communication with, or physical proximity to, another individual.

“Respondent” means the individual against whom enforcement of protection order is sought.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an Indian tribe or band that has jurisdiction to issue protection orders.

“Tribunal” means a court, agency, or other entity authorized by law to issue or modify a protection order.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 284, § 2.

15-15.1-3.
Judicial enforcement of order.

A person authorized by the law of this state to seek enforcement of a protection order may seek enforcement of a valid foreign protection order in a tribunal of this state. The court shall enforce the terms of the order, including terms that provide relief that the court would lack power to provide but for this chapter. The court shall enforce the order, whether the order was obtained by independent action or in another proceeding, if it is an order issued in response to a complaint, petition, or motion filed by or on behalf of an individual seeking protection. In a proceeding to enforce a foreign protection order, the court shall follow the procedures of this state for the enforcement of protection orders.

The court may not enforce a foreign protection order issued by a tribunal of a state that does not recognize the standing of a protected individual to seek enforcement of the order.

The court shall enforce the provisions of a valid foreign protection order which govern custody and visitation, if the order was issued in accordance with the jurisdictional requirements governing the issuance of custody and visitation orders in the issuing state.

A foreign protection order is valid if it:

Identifies the protected individual and the respondent;

Is currently in effect;

Was issued by a tribunal that had jurisdiction over the parties and subject matter under the law of the issuing state; and

Was issued after the respondent was given reasonable notice and had an opportunity to be heard before the tribunal issued the order or, in the case of an order ex parte, the respondent was given notice and has had or will have an opportunity to be heard within a reasonable time after the order was issued, in a manner consistent with the rights of the respondent to due process.

A foreign protection order valid on its face is prima facie evidence of its validity.

Absence of any of the criteria for validity of a foreign protection order is an affirmative defense in an action seeking enforcement of the order.

The court may enforce provisions of a mutual foreign protection order which favor a respondent only if:

The respondent filed a written pleading seeking a protection order from the tribunal of the issuing state; and

The tribunal of the issuing state made specific findings in favor of the respondent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 284, § 2.

15-15.1-4.
Nonjudicial enforcement of order.

A law enforcement officer of this state, upon determining that there is probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists and that the order has been violated, shall enforce the order as if it were the order of a tribunal of this state. Presentation of a protection order that identifies both the protected individual and the respondent and on its face, is currently in effect constitutes probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists. For the purposes of this section, the protection order may be inscribed on a tangible medium or may have been stored in an electronic or other medium if it is retrievable in perceivable form. Presentation of a certified copy of a protection order is not required for enforcement.

If a foreign protection order is not presented, a law enforcement officer of this state may consider other information in determining whether there is probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists.

If a law enforcement officer of the state determines that an otherwise valid foreign protection order cannot be enforced because the respondent has not been notified or served with the order, the officer shall inform the respondent of the order, make a reasonable effort to serve the order upon the respondent, and allow the respondent a reasonable opportunity to comply with the order before enforcing the order.

Registration or filing of an order in this state is not required for the enforcement of a valid foreign protection order pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 284, § 2.

15-15.1-4.1.
Form of certification or confirmation.

A form in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purposes of filing of certificate or confirmation:

STATE OF RHODE ISLAND FAMILY COURT ,S. Ct.(Name) Petitioner vs. (Name) C.A. No. Respondent CERTIFICATION OF PROTECTION/RESTRAINING ORDER It is hereby certified that the attached is a true and correct copy of the order entered in the above-captioned action on (date) and that the original of the attached order was duly executed by the judicial authority whose signature appears thereon. The order expires on (date). The order is: [ ] a civil protection/restraining order. OR [ ] a criminal protection/restraining order, that recognizes the standing of the plaintiff to seek enforcement of the order. It is further certified that: (a) The issuing court determined that it had jurisdiction over the parties and the subject matter under the laws of (state or Indian tribe). (b) The respondent was given reasonable notice and had opportunity to be heard before this order was issued; or if the order was issued ex parte, the respondent was given notice and had opportunity to be heard after the order was issued, consistent with the rights of the respondent to due process. (c) The order was otherwise issued in accordance with the requirements of the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act, and the Violence Against Women Act, . 18 U.S.C. § 2265 For custody and visitation orders: (d) The order was otherwise issued in accordance with the requirements of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act or the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act of this state/territory and is consistent with the provisions of the Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act. . 28 U.S.C. § 1738A The attached order shall be presumed to be valid and enforceable in this and other jurisdictions. Signature of Clerk of court or other authorized official:

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 284, § 2.

15-15.1-5.
Registration of order.

Any individual may register a foreign protection order in this state. To register a foreign protection order, an individual shall:

present a certified copy of the order to the appropriate law enforcement agency; or

present a certified copy of the order to the department of attorney general and request that the order be registered with the appropriate law enforcement agency.

Upon receipt of a foreign protection order the appropriate law enforcement agency shall register the order in accordance with this section. After the order is registered the appropriate law enforcement agency shall furnish to the individual registering the order a certified copy of the registered order.

The appropriate law enforcement agency shall register an order upon presentation of a copy of a protective order which has been certified by the issuing state. A registered foreign protection order that is inaccurate or is not currently in effect must be corrected or removed from the registry in accordance with the law of this state.

An individual registering a foreign protection order shall file an affidavit by the protected individual stating that, to the best of the protected individual’s knowledge, the order is currently in effect.

A foreign protection order registered under this chapter may be entered in any existing state or federal registry of protection orders, in accordance with applicable law.

A fee may not be charged for the registration of a foreign protection order.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 284, § 2.

15-15.1-6.
Immunity.

The state or a local governmental agency, or a law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, clerk of court, or any state or local governmental official acting in an official capacity, is immune from civil and criminal liability for an act or omission arising out of the registration or enforcement of a foreign protection order or the detention or arrest of an alleged violator of a foreign protection order if the act or omission was done in good faith in an effort to comply with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 284, § 2.

15-15.1-7.
Other remedies.

A protected individual who pursues remedies under this chapter is not precluded from pursuing other legal or equitable remedies against the respondent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 284, § 2.

15-15.1-8.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 284, § 2.

15-15.1-9.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 284, § 2.